Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-941
Early voting; written request for ballot; procedure.

(1) Any registered voter permitted to vote early pursuant to section 32-938 may, not more than one hundred twenty days before any election and not later than the close of business on the second Friday preceding the election, request a ballot for the election to be mailed to a specific address. A registered voter shall request a ballot in writing to the election commissioner or county clerk in the county where the registered voter has established his or her home, shall indicate his or her residence address, the address to which the ballot is to be mailed if different, and his or her telephone number if available, and shall include:

(a) The identification number of the voter's driver's license or state identification card issued by the State of Nebraska;

(b) A photocopy of any other valid photographic identification issued to or related to the voter; or

(c) The voter's reasonable impediment certification.

(2) If the identification number of the voter's driver's license or state identification card issued by the State of Nebraska is provided, the election commissioner or county clerk shall verify the driver's license or state identification card data with the information provided by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to section 32-308.

(3) If such identification or certification is not provided or cannot be verified, the election commissioner or county clerk shall contact the voter and inform the voter that the ballot will not be issued until the voter provides the identification or certification required under this section.

(4) The registered voter may use the form published by the election commissioner or county clerk pursuant to section 32-808. The registered voter shall sign the request. A registered voter may use a facsimile machine or electronic mail for the submission of a request for a ballot.

(5) The election commissioner or county clerk shall include a registration application with the ballots if the person is not registered. Registration applications shall not be mailed after the third Friday preceding the election. If the person is not registered to vote, the registration application shall be returned not later than the closing of the polls on the day of the election. No ballot issued under this section shall be counted unless such registration application is properly completed and processed.

(6) Subdivisions (1)(a) through (c) of this section do not apply to any voter who casts a ballot pursuant to section 32-939.02 or 32-939.03.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 284;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 93;

Laws 2002, LB 935, § 9;

Laws 2005, LB 98, § 13;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 43;

Laws 2011, LB499, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB575, § 20;

Laws 2016, LB874, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB514, § 13;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 44.